Maryland, session 2026, HB0336.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
2–607.
(c) (1) A commissioner shall receive applications and determine probable
cause for the issuance of charging documents.
(2) A commissioner shall advise arrested persons of their constitutional
rights, set bond or commit persons to jail in default of bond or release them on personal
recognizance if circumstances warrant, and conduct investigations and inquiries into the
circumstances of any matter presented to the commissioner in order to determine if
probable cause exists for the issuance of a charging document, warrant, or criminal
summons and, in general, perform all the functions of committing magistrates as exercised
by the justices of the peace prior to July 5, 1971.
(3) There shall be in each county, at all times, one or more commissioners
available for the convenience of the public and police in obtaining charging documents,
warrants, or criminal summonses and to advise arrested persons of their rights as required
by law.
(4) A commissioner may exercise the powers of office in any county to which
the commissioner is assigned by the Chief Judge of the District Court or a designee of the
Chief Judge of the District Court.
(5) The Chief Judge of the District Court may authorize one or more
commissioners to perform the duties of a commissioner regarding persons arrested in a
county other than the county in which the commissioner resides and for which the
commissioner was appointed when the arrested persons are brought before the
commissioner by a peace officer of the jurisdiction in which that arrest was made.

HOUSE BILL 336 3
(6) (i) An individual may file an application for a statement of charges
with a District Court commissioner.
(ii) On SUBJECT TO § 2–607.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE, ON review of
an application for a statement of charges, a District Court commissioner may issue a
summons or an arrest warrant.
(iii) A District Court commissioner may issue an arrest warrant only
on a finding that:
1. There is probable cause to believe that the defendant
committed the offense charged in the charging document; [and]
2. THE INDIVIDUAL FILING THE APPLICATION FOR A
STATEMENT OF CHARGES IS A POLICE OFFICER AS DEFINED IN § 3–201 OF THE
PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE OR A STATE’S ATTORNEY; AND
[2.] 3. A. The defendant previously has failed to respond to a
summons that has been personally served or a citation;
B. The whereabouts of the defendant are unknown and the
issuance of a warrant is necessary to subject the defendant to the jurisdiction of the court;
C. The defendant is in custody for another offense; or
D. There is probable cause to believe that the defendant poses
a danger to another person or to the community.
(iv) On a finding of good cause, a judge of the District Court or a judge
of a circuit court may recall an arrest warrant issued by a District Court commissioner
under this paragraph and issue a summons in its place.
2–607.1.
(A) ON REVIEW OF AN APPLICATION FOR A STATEMENT OF CHARGES
SUBMITTED BY AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS NOT A POLICE OFFICER OR A STATE’S
ATTORNEY, A DISTRICT COURT COMMISSIONER:
(1) MAY ISSUE A SUMMONS, IF THE COMMISSIONER DETERMINES
THAT THERE IS PROBABLE CAUSE TO BELIEVE THAT THE DEFENDANT COMMITTED
THE OFFENSE OR OFFENSES CHARGED IN THE CHARGING DOCUMENT;
(2) MAY NOT ISSUE AN ARREST WARRANT; AND

HOUSE BILL 336
(3) SHALL REFER AN APPLICATION FOR A STATEMENT OF CHARGES
FOR WHICH A SUMMONS WAS ISSUED UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION TO THE
STATE’S ATTORNEY’S OFFICE FOR REVIEW AND A PROMPT DETERMINATION OF
WHETHER A REQUEST FOR AN ARREST WARRANT SHALL BE MADE, IF THE DISTRICT
COURT COMMISSIONER FINDS THAT THERE IS PROBABLE CAUSE TO BELIEVE THAT
THE DEFENDANT POSES A DANGER TO ANOTHER PERSON OR TO THE COMMUNITY.
(B) ON RECEIPT OF AN APPLICATION FOR A STATEMENT OF CHARGES
UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(3) OF THIS SECTION, THE STATE’S ATTORNEY SHALL
REVIEW THE CASE AS SOON AS PRACTICABLE BUT NOT LATER THAN 72 HOURS AFTER
RECEIPT TO DETERMINE WHETHER TO REQUEST THAT A JUDGE OF THE DISTRICT
COURT OR A JUDGE OF THE CIRCUIT COURT ISSUE AN ARREST WARRANT.
(C) ON A FINDING OF GOOD CAUSE, A JUDGE OF THE DISTRICT COURT OR A
JUDGE OF THE CIRCUIT COURT MAY CONVERT A SUMMONS TO AN ARREST WARRANT.
(D) THE DISTRICT COURT SHALL INFORM A VICTIM OF CRIME WHETHER
CHARGES HAVE BEEN ISSUED IN RESPONSE TO AN APPLICATION FOR A STATEMENT
OF CHARGES FILED BY THE VICTIM.
2–607.2.
ON OR BEFORE MARCH 1, 2027, AND EACH MARCH 1 THEREAFTER, THE
MARYLAND JUDICIARY SHALL REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE
FOLLOWING DATA FOR THE PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR, DISAGGREGATED BY
COUNTY, AND BY THE RACE, SEX, AND AGE OF DEFENDANTS:
(1) THE NUMBER OF APPLICATIONS FOR A STATEMENT OF CHARGES
FILED, INCLUDING:
(I) WHETHER THE APPLICATION WAS FILED BY THE POLICE, A
STATE’S ATTORNEY, OR ANOTHER INDIVIDUAL; AND
(II) FOR EACH TYPE OF APPLICANT, WHETHER THE
APPLICATION WAS DENIED, RESULTED IN THE ISSUANCE OF A SUMMONS, OR
RESULTED IN THE ISSUANCE OF AN ARREST WARRANT; AND
(2) FOR EACH SUMMONS AND ARREST WARRANT ISSUED:
(I) WHETHER THE ARREST WARRANT WAS ISSUED BY A JUDGE
OR A COMMISSIONER;

HOUSE BILL 336 5
(II) WHETHER THERE WAS A REQUEST TO RECALL THE
SUMMONS OR ARREST WARRANT AND, IF SO, THE RESULT OF THE REQUEST; AND
(3) THE FINAL DISPOSITION OF THE CASE.
Article – Criminal Law
9–503.
(a) A person may not make, or cause to be made, a statement or report that the
person knows to be false as a whole or in material part to an official or unit of the State or
of a county, municipal corporation, or other political subdivision of the State that a crime
has been committed or that a condition imminently dangerous to public safety or health
exists, with the intent that the official or unit investigate, consider, or take action in
connection with that statement or report.
(b) A person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction
is subject to imprisonment not exceeding [6 months] 3 YEARS or a fine not exceeding $500
or both.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.